Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.505

Name.

The name of a limited liability partnership must comply with Article 3 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

[ 2015 c 176 s 5109; 1998 c 103 s 1102.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.